Nevada, session 83, AB469.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 616A.060 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616A.060 “Association’s administrator” means a person who is
[employed] :
1. Employed by or has contracted with the board of trustees of
an association of self-insured public or private employers to carry
out the policies of the board of trustees ; and [to be]
2. At the direction of the board of trustees, responsible [for] to
carry out the daily [operation] operations of the association [.] ,
including, without limitation, to meet the obligations of the
association pursuant to NRS 616B.362.
Sec. 2. NRS 616B.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.365 1. An association of self-insured public or private
employers must be operated by a board of trustees consisting of at
least five members whom the members of the association elect for
terms set forth in the bylaws of the association. If the association is
an association of self-insured:
(a) Public employers, the members of the board of trustees must
be officers or employees of the public employers who are members
of the association.
(b) Private employers, at least two-thirds of the members of the
board of trustees must be employees, officers or directors of the
members of the association. No association’s administrator or third-
party administrator employed by the association, or any owner,
officer, employee or other person affiliated with the association’s
administrator or third-party administrator, may serve as a member of
the board of trustees. Each member of the board of trustees must be
a resident of this State or an officer of a corporation authorized to do
business in this State.
2. The board of trustees of an association shall:
(a) Ensure the prompt payment of any compensation due
pursuant to chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of
NRS.
(b) Take such actions as are necessary to protect the assets of the
association.
(c) Employ full-time an association’s administrator to carry out
the policies of the board of trustees and perform such duties as the
board delegates to him or her. An association’s administrator shall
not directly administer claims or perform any of the other duties
assigned to a third-party administrator.
(d) Employ a third-party administrator to carry out the duties set
forth in NRS 616B.503.
-
*AB469*

– 6 –
(e) Employ an independent certified public accountant to
prepare the statement of financial condition required by
NRS 616B.404.
(f) Maintain minutes of its meetings and make the minutes
available for inspection by the Commissioner.
3. The board of trustees of an association shall not:
(a) Extend credit to any member of the association for the
payment of that member’s annual assessment, except pursuant to a
payment plan approved by the Commissioner.
(b) Borrow any money from the association or in the name of
the association, except in the ordinary course of its business, without
the prior approval of the Commissioner.
Sec. 3. NRS 616B.371 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.371 1. An association’s administrator [employed by an
association of self-insured public or private employers, or an
employee, officer or director of an association’s administrator,] may
[not be an employee, officer or director of a third-party
administrator employed by the association or] have a [direct or
indirect] financial interest in the third-party administrator [of the]
employed by the board of trustees of an association [.] of self-
insured public or private employers.
2. [The third-party administrator of an association of self-
insured public or private employers, or an employee, officer or
director of the third-party administrator, may not be an employee,
officer or director of an association’s administrator employed by the
association or have a direct or indirect financial interest in that
association’s administrator.
3.] Any contract entered into by an association of self-insured
public or private employers and a third-party administrator must
include a provision which states that, unless the Commissioner
otherwise provides, the third-party administrator shall administer
any claim or other obligation of the association to its conclusion
during the period of the contract.
Sec. 4. NRS 616B.554 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.554 1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Workers’ Compensation and Safety in the State Treasury the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers, which may
be used only to make payments in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 616B.557 and 616B.560. The Board shall administer the
Account based upon recommendations made by the Administrator
pursuant to subsection [8.] 7.
2. All [assessments,] penalties, bonds, securities and all other
properties received, collected or acquired by the Board for the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers must be
delivered to the custody of the State Treasurer.
-
*AB469*

– 7 –
3. All money and securities in the Account must be held by the
State Treasurer as custodian thereof to be used solely for workers’
compensation for employees of self-insured employers.
4. The State Treasurer may disburse money from the Account
only upon written order of the Board.
5. The State Treasurer shall invest money of the Account in the
same manner and in the same securities in which the State Treasurer
is authorized to invest State General Funds which are in the custody
of the State Treasurer. Income realized from the investment of the
assets of the Account must be credited to the Fund.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations for the establishment and
administration of [assessment rates,] payments and penalties.
[Assessment rates must result in an equitable distribution of costs
among the self-insured employers and must be based upon expected
annual expenditures for claims for payments from the Subsequent
Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers.]
7. [The Commissioner shall assign an actuary to review the
establishment of assessment rates. The rates must be filed with the
Commissioner 30 days before their effective date. Any self-insured
employer who wishes to appeal the rate so filed must do so pursuant
to NRS 679B.310.
8.] The Administrator shall:
(a) Evaluate any claim submitted to the Board for payment or
reimbursement from the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured
Employers and recommend to the Board any appropriate action to
be taken concerning the claim; and
(b) Submit to the Board any other recommendations relating to
the Account.
Sec. 5. NRS 616B.557 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.557 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.560:
1. If an employee of a self-insured employer has a permanent
physical impairment from any cause or origin and incurs , on or
before September 30, 2025, a subsequent disability by injury arising
out of and in the course of his or her employment which entitles the
employee to compensation for disability that is substantially greater
by reason of the combined effects of the preexisting impairment and
the subsequent injury than that which would have resulted from the
subsequent injury alone, the compensation due must be charged to
the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
2. If the subsequent injury of such an employee incurred on or
before September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is
determined that the death would not have occurred except for the
preexisting permanent physical impairment, the compensation due
-
*AB469*

– 8 –
must be charged to the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured
Employers in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
3. As used in this section, “permanent physical impairment”
means any permanent condition, whether congenital or caused by
injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or
obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining reemployment if
the employee is unemployed. For the purposes of this section, a
condition is not a “permanent physical impairment” unless it would
support a rating of permanent impairment of 6 percent or more of
the whole person if evaluated according to the American Medical
Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as
adopted and supplemented by the Division pursuant to
NRS 616C.110.
4. To qualify under this section for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers, the self-
insured employer must establish by written records that the self-
insured employer had knowledge of the “permanent physical
impairment” at the time the employee was hired or that the
employee was retained in employment after the self-insured
employer acquired such knowledge.
5. A self-insured employer must submit to the Board a claim
for reimbursement from the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-
Insured Employers.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing procedures
for submitting claims against the Subsequent Injury Account for
Self-Insured Employers. The Board shall notify the self-insured
employer of its decision on such a claim within 120 days after the
claim is received.
7. An appeal of any decision made concerning a claim against
the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers must be
submitted directly to the district court.
Sec. 6. NRS 616B.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.560 1. A self-insured employer who pays
compensation due to an employee who has a permanent physical
impairment from any cause or origin and incurs , on or before
September 30, 2025, a subsequent disability by injury arising out of
and in the course of his or her employment which entitles the
employee to compensation for disability that is substantially greater
by reason of the combined effects of the preexisting impairment and
the subsequent injury than that which would have resulted from the
subsequent injury alone is entitled to be reimbursed from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers if:
(a) The employee knowingly made a false representation as to
his or her physical condition at the time the employee was hired by
the self-insured employer;
-
*AB469*

– 9 –
(b) The self-insured employer relied upon the false
representation and this reliance formed a substantial basis of the
employment; and
(c) A causal connection existed between the false representation
and the subsequent disability.
 If the subsequent injury of the employee incurred on or before
September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is determined
that the death would not have occurred except for the preexisting
permanent physical impairment, any compensation paid is entitled
to be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-
Insured Employers.
2. A self-insured employer shall notify the Board of any
possible claim against the Subsequent Injury Account for Self-
Insured Employers pursuant to this section no later than 60 days
after the date of the subsequent injury or the date the self-insured
employer learns of the employee’s false representation, whichever is
later.
Sec. 7. NRS 616B.575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.575 1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Workers’ Compensation and Safety in the State Treasury the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers, which may be used only to make payments in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 616B.578 and 616B.581.
The Board shall administer the Account based upon
recommendations made by the Administrator pursuant to
subsection [8.] 7.
2. All [assessments,] penalties, bonds, securities and all other
properties received, collected or acquired by the Board for the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers must be delivered to the custody of the State
Treasurer.
3. All money and securities in the Account must be held by the
State Treasurer as custodian thereof to be used solely for workers’
compensation for employees of members of Associations of Self-
Insured Public or Private Employers.
4. The State Treasurer may disburse money from the Account
only upon written order of the Board.
5. The State Treasurer shall invest money of the Account in the
same manner and in the same securities in which the State Treasurer
is authorized to invest State General Funds which are in the custody
of the State Treasurer. Income realized from the investment of the
assets of the Account must be credited to the Account.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations for the establishment and
administration of [assessment rates,] payments and penalties.
[Assessment rates must result in an equitable distribution of costs
-
*AB469*

– 10 –
among the associations of self-insured public or private employers
and must be based upon expected annual expenditures for claims for
payments from the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of
Self-Insured Public or Private Employers.]
7. [The Commissioner shall assign an actuary to review the
establishment of assessment rates. The rates must be filed with the
Commissioner 30 days before their effective date. Any association
of self-insured public or private employers that wishes to appeal the
rate so filed must do so pursuant to NRS 679B.310.
8.] The Administrator shall:
(a) Evaluate any claim submitted to the Board for payment or
reimbursement from the Subsequent Injury Account for
Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers and
recommend to the Board any appropriate action to be taken
concerning the claim; and
(b) Submit to the Board any other recommendations relating to
the Account.
Sec. 8. NRS 616B.578 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.578 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.581:
1. If an employee of a member of an association of self-insured
public or private employers has a permanent physical impairment
from any cause or origin and incurs , on or before September 30,
2025, a subsequent disability by injury arising out of and in the
course of his or her employment which entitles the employee to
compensation for disability that is substantially greater by reason of
the combined effects of the preexisting impairment and the
subsequent injury than that which would have resulted from the
subsequent injury alone, the compensation due must be charged to
the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured
Public or Private Employers in accordance with regulations adopted
by the Board.
2. If the subsequent injury of such an employee incurred on or
before September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is
determined that the death would not have occurred except for the
preexisting permanent physical impairment, the compensation due
must be charged to the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations
of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Board.
3. As used in this section, “permanent physical impairment”
means any permanent condition, whether congenital or caused by
injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or
obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining reemployment if
the employee is unemployed. For the purposes of this section, a
condition is not a “permanent physical impairment” unless it would
support a rating of permanent impairment of 6 percent or more of
-
*AB469*

– 11 –
the whole person if evaluated according to the American Medical
Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as
adopted and supplemented by the Division pursuant to
NRS 616C.110.
4. To qualify under this section for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers, the association of self-insured public or
private employers must establish by written records that the
employer had knowledge of the “permanent physical impairment” at
the time the employee was hired or that the employee was retained
in employment after the employer acquired such knowledge.
5. An association of self-insured public or private employers
must submit to the Board a claim for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public
or Private Employers.
6. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing procedures
for submitting claims against the Subsequent Injury Account for
Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers. The
Board shall notify the Association of Self-Insured Public or Private
Employers of its decision on such a claim within 120 days after the
claim is received.
7. An appeal of any decision made concerning a claim against
the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured
Public or Private Employers must be submitted directly to the
district court.
Sec. 9. NRS 616B.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.581 1. An association of self-insured public or private
employers that pays compensation due to an employee who has a
permanent physical impairment from any cause or origin and incurs
, on or before September 30, 2025, a subsequent disability by injury
arising out of and in the course of his or her employment which
entitles the employee to compensation for disability that is
substantially greater by reason of the combined effects of the
preexisting impairment and the subsequent injury than that which
would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone is entitled to
be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for Associations
of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers if:
(a) The employee knowingly made a false representation as to
his or her physical condition at the time the employee was hired by
the member of the Association of Self-Insured Public or Private
Employers;
(b) The employer relied upon the false representation and this
reliance formed a substantial basis of the employment; and
(c) A causal connection existed between the false representation
and the subsequent disability.
-
*AB469*

– 12 –
 If the subsequent injury of the employee incurred on or before
September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is determined
that the death would not have occurred except for the preexisting
permanent physical impairment, any compensation paid is entitled
to be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for
Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private Employers.
2. An association of self-insured public or private employers
shall notify the Board of any possible claim against the Subsequent
Injury Account for Associations of Self-Insured Public or Private
Employers pursuant to this section no later than 60 days after the
date of the subsequent injury or the date the employer learns of the
employee’s false representation, whichever is later.
Sec. 10. NRS 616B.584 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.584 1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Workers’ Compensation and Safety in the State Treasury the
Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers, which may be used
only to make payments in accordance with the provisions of NRS
616B.587 and 616B.590. The Administrator shall administer the
Account.
2. All [assessments,] penalties, bonds, securities and all other
properties received, collected or acquired by the Administrator for
the Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers must be
delivered to the custody of the State Treasurer.
3. All money and securities in the Account must be held by the
State Treasurer as custodian thereof to be used solely for workers’
compensation for employees whose employers are insured by
private carriers.
4. The State Treasurer may disburse money from the Account
only upon written order of the State Controller.
5. The State Treasurer shall invest money of the Account in the
same manner and in the same securities in which the State Treasurer
is authorized to invest State General Funds which are in the custody
of the State Treasurer. Income realized from the investment of the
assets of the Account must be credited to the Account.
6. The Administrator shall adopt regulations for the
establishment and administration of [assessment rates,] payments
and penalties. [Assessment rates must reflect the relative hazard of
the employments covered by private carriers, must result in an
equitable distribution of costs among the private carriers and must
be based upon expected annual premiums to be received.
7. The Commissioner shall assign an actuary to review the
establishment of assessment rates. The rates must be filed with the
Commissioner 30 days before their effective date. Any private
carrier who wishes to appeal the rate so filed must do so pursuant to
NRS 679B.310.]
-
*AB469*

– 13 –
Sec. 11. NRS 616B.587 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.587 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.590:
1. If an employee of an employer who is insured by a private
carrier has a permanent physical impairment from any cause or
origin and incurs , on or before September 30, 2025, a subsequent
disability by injury arising out of and in the course of his or her
employment which entitles the employee to compensation for
disability that is substantially greater by reason of the combined
effects of the preexisting impairment and the subsequent injury than
that which would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone,
the compensation due must be charged to the Subsequent Injury
Account for Private Carriers in accordance with regulations adopted
by the Administrator.
2. If the subsequent injury of such an employee incurred on or
before September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is
determined that the death would not have occurred except for the
preexisting permanent physical impairment, the compensation due
must be charged to the Subsequent Injury Account for Private
Carriers in accordance with regulations adopted by the
Administrator.
3. As used in this section, “permanent physical impairment”
means any permanent condition, whether congenital or caused by
injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or
obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining reemployment if
the employee is unemployed. For the purposes of this section, a
condition is not a “permanent physical impairment” unless it would
support a rating of permanent impairment of 6 percent or more of
the whole person if evaluated according to the American Medical
Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as
adopted and supplemented by the Division pursuant to
NRS 616C.110.
4. To qualify under this section for reimbursement from the
Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers, the private carrier
must establish by written records that the employer had knowledge
of the “permanent physical impairment” at the time the employee
was hired or that the employee was retained in employment after the
employer acquired such knowledge.
5. A private carrier must submit to the Administrator a claim
for reimbursement from the Subsequent Injury Account for Private
Carriers.
6. The Administrator shall adopt regulations establishing
procedures for submitting claims against the Subsequent Injury
Account for Private Carriers. The Administrator shall notify the
private carrier of his or her decision on such a claim within 120 days
after the claim is received.
-
*AB469*

– 14 –
7. An appeal of any decision made concerning a claim against
the Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers must be
submitted directly to the appeals officer. The appeals officer shall
hear such an appeal within 45 days after the appeal is submitted to
the appeals officer.
Sec. 12. NRS 616B.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.590 1. A private carrier who pays compensation due to
an employee who has a permanent physical impairment from any
cause or origin and incurs , on or before September 30, 2025, a
subsequent disability by injury arising out of and in the course of his
or her employment which entitles the employee to compensation for
disability that is substantially greater by reason of the combined
effects of the preexisting impairment and the subsequent injury than
that which would have resulted from the subsequent injury alone is
entitled to be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for
Private Carriers if:
(a) The employee knowingly made a false representation as to
his or her physical condition at the time the employee was hired by
the employer insured by a private carrier;
(b) The employer relied upon the false representation and this
reliance formed a substantial basis of the employment; and
(c) A causal connection existed between the false representation
and the subsequent disability.
 If the subsequent injury of the employee incurred on or before
September 30, 2025, results in his or her death and it is determined
that the death would not have occurred except for the preexisting
permanent physical impairment, any compensation paid is entitled
to be reimbursed from the Subsequent Injury Account for Private
Carriers.
2. A private carrier shall notify the Administrator of any
possible claim against the Subsequent Injury Account for Private
Carriers pursuant to this section no later than 60 days after the date
of the subsequent injury or the date the employer learns of the
employee’s false representation, whichever is later.
Sec. 13. NRS 616B.624 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.624 1. If a quasi-public or private corporation or a
limited-liability company is required to be insured pursuant to
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, of NRS, an officer of the
corporation or a manager of the company who:
(a) Receives pay for services performed as an officer [,] or
manager [or employee] of the corporation or company shall be
deemed for the purposes of those chapters to receive a minimum pay
of $6,000 per policy year and a maximum pay of $36,000 per policy
year.
-
*AB469*

– 15 –
(b) Does not receive pay for services performed as an officer,
manager or employee of the corporation or company shall be
deemed for the purposes of those chapters to receive a minimum pay
of $500 per month or $6,000 per policy year.
2. An officer or manager who does not receive pay for services
performed as an officer, manager or employee of the corporation or
company may elect to reject coverage for himself or herself by filing
written notice thereof with the corporation or company and the
insurer. The rejection is effective upon receipt of the notice by the
insurer.
3. An officer or manager of such a corporation or company
who:
(a) Owns the corporation or company; and
(b) Receives pay for the services performed,
 may elect to reject coverage for himself or herself by filing
written notice thereof with the insurer. The rejection is effective
upon receipt of the notice by the insurer.
4. An officer or manager who has rejected coverage may
rescind that rejection by filing written notice thereof with the
corporation or company and the insurer. The rescission is effective
upon receipt of the notice by the insurer. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3, if an officer or manager who has rejected
coverage receives pay for services performed as an officer, manager
or employee of the corporation or company, the officer or manager
shall be deemed to have rescinded that rejection.
5. A nonprofit corporation whose officers do not receive pay
for services performed as officers or employees of the corporation
may elect to reject coverage for its current officers and all future
officers who do not receive such pay by filing written notice thereof
with the corporation and the insurer. The rejection is effective upon
receipt of the notice by the insurer.
6. A nonprofit corporation which has rejected coverage for its
officers who do not receive pay for services performed as officers or
employees of the corporation may rescind that rejection by filing
written notice thereof with the corporation and the insurer. The
rescission is effective upon receipt of the notice by the insurer. If an
officer of a nonprofit corporation which has rejected coverage
receives pay for services performed as an officer or employee of the
corporation, the corporation shall be deemed to have rescinded that
rejection.
Sec. 14. NRS 616C.087 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.087 1. The Legislature hereby declares that:
(a) The choice of a treating physician or chiropractic physician
is a substantive right and substantive benefit of an injured employee
-
*AB469*

– 16 –
who has a claim under the Nevada Industrial Insurance Act or the
Nevada Occupational Diseases Act.
(b) The injured employees of this State have a substantive right
to an adequate choice of physicians and chiropractic physicians to
treat their industrial injuries and occupational diseases.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 3 and 4 [:
(a) The] , an insurer’s list of physicians and chiropractic
physicians from which an injured employee may choose pursuant
to NRS 616C.090 must:
(a) Consist of physicians and chiropractic physicians selected
from the panel maintained by the Administrator pursuant to NRS
616C.090 [must not] ;
(b) Not include a physician or chiropractic physician in a
discipline or specialization if the physician or chiropractic physician
does not accept and treat injured employees for industrial injuries or
occupational diseases in that discipline or specialization; and
[(b) An insurer’s list of physicians and chiropractic physicians
from which an injured employee may choose pursuant to NRS
616C.090 must include]
(c) Include not [less] fewer than [12] five physicians or
chiropractic physicians, as applicable, in each of the three
geographic regions in this State designated by the Administrator
pursuant to subsection 14, in each of the following disciplines and
specializations : [, without limitation, from the panel of physicians
and chiropractic physicians maintained by the Administrator
pursuant to NRS 616C.090:]
(1) Orthopedic surgery on spines;
(2) Orthopedic surgery on shoulders;
(3) Orthopedic surgery on elbows;
(4) Orthopedic surgery on wrists;
(5) Orthopedic surgery on hands;
(6) Orthopedic surgery on hips;
(7) Orthopedic surgery on knees;
(8) Orthopedic surgery on ankles;
(9) Orthopedic surgery on feet;
(10) Neurosurgery;
(11) Neurology;
(12) Cardiology;
(13) Pulmonology;
(14) Psychiatry;
(15) Pain management;
(16) Occupational medicine;
(17) Physiatry or physical medicine;
(18) General practice or family medicine; and
-
*AB469*

– 17 –
(19) Chiropractic medicine.
 If the [panel] insurer’s list of physicians and chiropractic
physicians [maintained by the Administrator pursuant to NRS
616C.090] contains fewer than [12] five physicians or chiropractic
physicians, as applicable, in a region designated by the
Administrator pursuant to subsection 14 for a discipline or
specialization specifically identified in this subsection, [all of the
physicians] an injured employee in that region may choose a
physician or chiropractic [physicians,] physician, as applicable, [on
the panel for] in that discipline or specialization [must be included
on the insurer’s list.] from the panel maintained by the
Administrator pursuant to NRS 616C.090.
3. For any other discipline or specialization not specifically
identified in subsection 2, the insurer’s list must include not fewer
than [8] four physicians or chiropractic physicians, as applicable,
unless the panel of physicians and chiropractic physicians
maintained by the Administrator pursuant to NRS 616C.090
contains fewer than [8] four physicians or chiropractic physicians,
as applicable, for that discipline or specialization, in which case all
of the physicians or chiropractic physicians, as applicable, on the
panel for that discipline or specialization must be included on the
insurer’s list.
4. For each county whose population is 100,000 or more, an
insurer’s list of physicians and chiropractic physicians must include
for that county a number of physicians and chiropractic physicians,
as applicable, that is not less than the number required pursuant to
subsections 2 and 3 and that also [maintain] :
(a) Maintain in that county:
[(a)] (1) An active practice; and
[(b)] (2) A physical office [.] ; or
(b) Provide in that county services through telehealth pursuant
to NRS 616C.730.
5. If an insurer fails to maintain a list of physicians and
chiropractic physicians that complies with the requirements of
subsections 2, 3 and 4, an injured employee may choose a physician
or chiropractic physician from the panel of physicians and
chiropractic physicians maintained by the Administrator pursuant to
NRS 616C.090.
6. Each insurer shall, not later than October 1 of each year,
update the list of physicians and chiropractic physicians and [file]
submit the list [with] to the Administrator. The list must be certified
by [an adjuster who is licensed pursuant to chapter 684A of NRS.] a
responsible person of the insurer.
-
*AB469*

– 18 –
7. Upon receipt of a list of physicians and chiropractic
physicians that is [filed] submitted pursuant to subsection 6, the
Administrator shall:
(a) [Stamp] Acknowledge receipt of the list as having been
[filed;] submitted; and
(b) Indicate on the list the date on which it was [filed.]
submitted to the Administrator by the insurer.
8. The Administrator shall:
(a) Provide a copy of an insurer’s list of physicians and
chiropractic physicians to any member of the public who requests a
copy; or
(b) Post a copy of each insurer’s list of physicians and
chiropractic physicians on [an] the Internet website [maintained by
the Administrator and] of the Division in an area of the Internet
website that is accessible to the public for viewing, printing or
downloading.
9. If an insurer is required to update its list of physicians and
chiropractic physicians to meet the requirements set forth in this
section or any regulations adopted by the Administrator, the
insurer shall update and resubmit the list to the Administrator,
who must proceed in accordance with subsection 8.
10. An update to the panel of physicians and chiropractic
physicians maintained by the Administrator pursuant to NRS
616C.090 does not cause an insurer’s list of physicians and
chiropractic physicians to be automatically updated.
11. At any time, a physician , [or] chiropractic physician or
person designated by a physician or chiropractic physician
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 616C.090 may
request in writing that [he or she] the physician, chiropractic
physician or designee be removed from an insurer’s list of
physicians and chiropractic physicians. The insurer must comply
with the request and omit the physician , [or] chiropractic physician
or designee from the next list which the insurer [files with] submits
to the Administrator.
[10.] 12. A physician or chiropractic physician may not be
involuntarily removed from [an insurer’s list] the panel of
physicians and chiropractic physicians maintained by the
Administrator pursuant to NRS 616C.090 except for good cause.
As used in this subsection, “good cause” means that one or more of
the following circumstances apply:
(a) The physician or chiropractic physician has died or is
disabled.
(b) The license of the physician or chiropractic physician has
been revoked or suspended.
-
*AB469*

– 19 –
(c) The physician or chiropractic physician has been convicted
of:
(1) A felony; or
(2) A crime for a violation of a provision of chapter 616D of
NRS.
(d) The physician or chiropractic physician [has been] is
removed from the panel [of physicians and chiropractic physicians
maintained by the Administrator pursuant to NRS 616C.090] by the
Administrator upon a finding that the physician or chiropractic
physician:
(1) Has failed to comply with the standards for treatment of
industrial injuries or occupational diseases as established by the
Administrator; or
(2) Does not accept and treat injured employees under
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS.
[11.] 13. Unless a physician or chiropractic physician, as
applicable, is removed pursuant to subsection 12 from [an insurer’s
list] the panel of physicians and chiropractic physicians maintained
by the Administrator pursuant to [subsection 10,] NRS 616C.090,
an injured employee may continue to receive treatment from that
physician or chiropractic physician even if:
(a) The employer of the injured employee changes insurers or
administrators.
(b) The physician or chiropractic physician is no longer included
in the applicable insurer’s list of physicians and chiropractic
physicians, provided that the physician or chiropractic physician
agrees to continue to accept compensation for that treatment at the
rates which:
(1) Were previously agreed upon when the physician or
chiropractic physician was most recently included in the list; or
(2) Are newly negotiated but do not exceed the amounts
provided under the fee schedule adopted by the Administrator.
[12.] 14. The Administrator shall adopt regulations
[prescribing] :
(a) Prescribing the form in which [a list] the panel of
physicians and chiropractic physicians [created by an employer,
insurer or third-party administrator pursuant to this section] must be
maintained [. The] by the Administrator [shall require] pursuant to
NRS 616C.090. The regulations must require that [any such list]
the panel be maintained in a format which is easily searchable,
including, without limitation, an indexed database, a portable
document format, a spreadsheet with data that may be filtered, a
comma-separated values file or any other comparable format.
-
*AB469*

– 20 –
(b) That divide this State into three geographic regions
designated by the Administrator for the purposes of paragraph (c)
of subsection 2.
15. As used in this section, “responsible person” means any
person who is responsible for, controls or is authorized to control
or advise the affairs of an insurer.
Sec. 15. NRS 616C.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.090 1. The Administrator shall establish, maintain and
update not less frequently than annually on or before July 1 of each
year, a panel of physicians and chiropractic physicians who have
demonstrated special competence and interest in industrial health to
treat injured employees under chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or
chapter 617 of NRS. The Administrator shall maintain the following
information relating to each physician and chiropractic physician on
the panel:
(a) The name of the physician or chiropractic physician [.] and a
designee for the physician or chiropractic physician, as applicable.
(b) The title or degree of the physician or chiropractic physician.
(c) The legal name of the practice of the physician or
chiropractic physician and the name under which the practice does
business.
(d) The street address of the location of every office of the
physician or chiropractic physician.
(e) The telephone number of every office of the physician or
chiropractic physician.
(f) The primary electronic mail address for the practice of the
physician or chiropractic physician.
(g) Every discipline and specialization practiced by the
physician or chiropractic physician.
[(g)] (h) Every condition and part of the body which the
physician or chiropractic physician will treat.
2. Every employer whose insurer has not entered into a
contract with an organization for managed care or with providers of
health care pursuant to NRS 616B.527 shall maintain a list of those
physicians and chiropractic physicians on the panel who are
reasonably accessible to his or her employees.
3. An injured employee whose employer’s insurer has not
entered into a contract with an organization for managed care or
with providers of health care pursuant to NRS 616B.527 may
choose a treating physician or chiropractic physician from the panel
of physicians and chiropractic physicians [.] maintained by the
Administrator pursuant to this section. If the injured employee is
not satisfied with the first physician or chiropractic physician he or
she so chooses, the injured employee may make an alternative
choice of physician or chiropractic physician from the panel if the
-
*AB469*

– 21 –
choice is made within 90 days after his or her injury. The insurer
shall notify the first physician or chiropractic physician in writing.
The notice must be postmarked within 3 working days after the
insurer receives knowledge of the change. The first physician or
chiropractic physician must be reimbursed only for the services the
physician or chiropractic physician, as applicable, rendered to the
injured employee up to and including the date of notification.
Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any further change
is subject to the approval of the insurer or by order of a hearing
officer or appeals officer. A request for a change of physician or
chiropractic physician must be granted or denied within 10 days
after a written request for such a change is received from the injured
employee. If the insurer takes no action on the request within 10
days, the request shall be deemed granted. Any request for a change
of physician or chiropractic physician must include the name of the
new physician or chiropractic physician chosen by the injured
employee. If the treating physician or chiropractic physician refers
the injured employee to a specialist for treatment, the insurer shall
provide to the injured employee a list that includes the name of each
physician or chiropractic physician with that specialization who is
on the panel. Not later than 14 days after receiving the list, the
injured employee shall select a physician or chiropractic physician
from the list.
4. An injured employee whose employer’s insurer has entered
into a contract with an organization for managed care or with
providers of health care pursuant to NRS 616B.527 must choose a
treating physician or chiropractic physician pursuant to the terms of
that contract. If the injured employee is not satisfied with the first
physician or chiropractic physician he or she so chooses, the injured
employee may make an alternative choice of physician or
chiropractic physician pursuant to the terms of the contract without
the approval of the insurer if the choice is made within 90 days after
his or her injury. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
any further change in the choice of a physician or chiropractic
physician is subject to the approval of the insurer or by order of a
hearing officer or appeals officer. The physician or chiropractic
physician so chosen must be chosen from the insurer’s list of
physicians and chiropractic physicians submitted to the
Administrator pursuant to NRS 616C.087. A request for a change
of physician or chiropractic physician must be granted or denied
within 10 days after a written request for such a change is received
from the injured employee. If the insurer takes no action on the
request within 10 days, the request shall be deemed granted. If the
injured employee, after choosing a treating physician or chiropractic
physician, moves to a county which is not served by the
-
*AB469*

– 22 –
organization for managed care or providers of health care named in
the contract and the insurer determines that it is impractical for the
injured employee to continue treatment with the physician or
chiropractic physician, the injured employee must choose a treating
physician or chiropractic physician who has agreed to the terms of
that contract unless the insurer authorizes the injured employee to
choose another physician or chiropractic physician. If the treating
physician or chiropractic physician refers the injured employee to a
specialist for treatment, the insurer shall provide to the injured
employee a list that includes the name of each physician or
chiropractic physician with that specialization who is available
pursuant to the terms of the contract with the organization for
managed care or with providers of health care pursuant to NRS
616B.527, as appropriate. Not later than 14 days after receiving the
list, the injured employee shall select a physician or chiropractic
physician from the list. If the employee fails to select a physician or
chiropractic physician, the insurer may select a physician or
chiropractic physician with that specialization. If a physician
or chiropractic physician with that specialization is not available
pursuant to the terms of the contract, the organization for managed
care or the provider of health care may select a physician or
chiropractic physician with that specialization.
5. If the injured employee is not satisfied with the physician or
chiropractic physician selected by himself or herself or by the
insurer, the organization for managed care or the provider of health
care pursuant to subsection 4, the injured employee may make an
alternative choice of physician or chiropractic physician pursuant to
the terms of the contract. A change in the choice of a treating
physician or chiropractic physician may be made at any time but is
subject to the approval of the insurer or by order of a hearing officer
or appeals officer. The physician or chiropractic physician so
chosen must be chosen from the insurer’s list of physicians and
chiropractic physicians submitted to the Administrator pursuant to
NRS 616C.087. A request for a change of physician or chiropractic
physician must be granted or denied within 10 days after a written
request for such a change is received from the injured employee. If
no action is taken on the request within 10 days, the request shall be
deemed granted. Any request for a change of physician or
chiropractic physician must include the name of the new physician
or chiropractic physician chosen by the injured employee. If the
insurer denies a request for a change in the treating physician or
chiropractic physician under this subsection, the insurer must
include in a written notice of denial to the injured employee the
specific reason for the denial of the request.
-
*AB469*

– 23 –
6. Except when emergency medical care is required and except
as otherwise provided in NRS 616C.055, the insurer is not
responsible for any charges for medical treatment or other accident
benefits furnished or ordered by any physician, chiropractic
physician or other person selected by the injured employee in
disregard of the provisions of this section or for any compensation
for any aggravation of the injured employee’s injury attributable to
improper treatments by such physician, chiropractic physician or
other person.
7. The Administrator may order necessary changes in [a] the
panel of physicians and chiropractic physicians and shall:
(a) Suspend or remove any physician or chiropractic physician
from [a] the panel for good cause shown in accordance with NRS
616C.087; and
(b) Remove from being included on [a] the panel as a
practitioner of a discipline or specialization any physician or
chiropractic physician who does not accept and treat injured
employees for industrial injuries or occupational diseases in that
discipline or specialization.
8. Any interested person may notify the Administrator, on a
form prescribed by the Administrator, if the person believes that a
physician or chiropractic physician does not accept and treat injured
employees:
(a) Under chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of
NRS for industrial injuries or occupational diseases; or
(b) For industrial injuries or occupational diseases in a discipline
or specialization for which the physician or chiropractic physician is
included on [a] the panel of physicians and chiropractic physicians
maintained by the Administrator pursuant to this section.
9. If the Administrator receives notice pursuant to subsection 8,
the Administrator shall:
(a) Conduct an investigation to determine whether the physician
or chiropractic physician may remain on the panel for a discipline or
specialization; and
(b) Publish or cause to be published on the Internet website of
the Division , in an area of the Internet website accessible to the
public, not later than 90 days after receiving the notice the results of
the investigation.
10. A physician or chiropractic physician who is removed from
[a] the panel as a practitioner of a discipline or specialization
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 7 may request, on a form
prescribed by the Administrator, to be reinstated on [a] the panel for
that discipline or specialization if the physician or chiropractic
physician demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Administrator that
-
*AB469*

– 24 –
he or she accepts and treats injured employees for that discipline or
specialization.
11. An injured employee may receive treatment by more than
one physician or chiropractic physician:
(a) If the insurer provides written authorization for such
treatment; or
(b) By order of a hearing officer or appeals officer.
12. The Administrator shall design a form that notifies injured
employees of their right pursuant to subsections 3, 4 and 5 to select
an alternative treating physician or chiropractic physician and make
the form available to insurers for distribution pursuant to subsection
2 of NRS 616C.050.
Sec. 16. NRS 616C.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.145 1. An injured employee may obtain an independent
medical examination:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3,
whenever a dispute arises from a determination issued by the insurer
regarding the approval of care, the direction of a treatment plan or
the scope of the claim;
(b) Within 30 days after an injured employee receives any report
generated pursuant to a medical examination requested by the
insurer pursuant to NRS 616C.140; or
(c) At any time by leave of a hearing officer or appeals officer
after the denial of any therapy or treatment.
2. An injured employee is entitled to an independent medical
examination pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 only:
(a) For a claim for compensation that is open;
(b) When the closure of a claim for compensation is under
dispute pursuant to NRS 616C.235; or
(c) When a hearing or appeal is pending pursuant to NRS
616C.330 or 616C.360.
3. An injured employee is entitled to only one independent
medical examination [per calendar year] within a 12-month period
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an
independent medical examination must not involve treatment and
must be conducted by a physician or chiropractic physician selected
by the injured employee from the [panel] insurer’s list of physicians
and chiropractic physicians [established] submitted to the
Administrator pursuant to [subsection 1 of NRS 616C.090.]
NRS 616C.087.
5. [An injured employee is entitled to request an independent
medical examination pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 for a
permanent partial disability to determine if the injured employee has
a ratable impairment or, if the injured employee is seeking to
-
*AB469*

– 25 –
dispute an initial rating determination, to obtain a second rating. The
injured employee must select the rating physician or chiropractic
physician at random from the list of qualified physicians and
chiropractic physicians maintained by the Administrator pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 616C.490, unless the insurer and the injured
employee otherwise agree to a rating physician or chiropractic
physician. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit
an injured employee from obtaining a determination for a permanent
partial disability pursuant to NRS 616C.100.
6. The insurer shall:
(a) Pay the costs of any independent medical examination
conducted pursuant to this section in accordance with subsection 7;
and
(b) Upon request, receive a copy of any report or other
document that is generated as a result of the independent medical
examination.
7.] The rates of reimbursement for an independent medical
examination conducted pursuant to this section must be [:
(a) For an independent medical examination other than an
independent medical examination conducted pursuant to subsection
5,] the rates applicable to independent medical examinations, as set
forth in the schedule of fees established by the Administrator
pursuant to NRS 616C.260.
[(b) For an independent medical examination conducted
pursuant to subsection 5, the rates applicable to a permanent partial
disability, as set forth in the schedule of fees established by the
Administrator pursuant to NRS 616C.260.
8. If an injured employee requests an independent medical
examination pursuant to subsection 5 to obtain a second rating and
the second rating does not result in a higher percentage of disability
than the initial rating determination, the insurer may recover the cost
of the independent medical examination, determined in accordance
with the rates of reimbursement specified in paragraph (b) of
subsection 7, from the amount of the award for permanent partial
disability that the injured employee is entitled to be paid for that
claim pursuant to NRS 616C.490.
9. The provisions of this section do not apply to an independent
medical examination ordered by a hearing officer pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 616C.330 or by an appeals officer pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 616C.360.]
Sec. 17. NRS 616C.232 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.232 1. If an injured employee is discharged from his or
her employment as a result of misconduct, an insurer may deny
compensation for temporary total disability and vocational
rehabilitation services to the injured employee because of that
-
*AB469*

– 26 –
discharge for misconduct only if the insurer proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that:
(a) The injured employee was discharged from his or her
employment solely for the employee’s misconduct and not for any
reason relating to the employee’s claim for compensation; and
(b) It is the injured employee’s discharge from his or her
employment for misconduct, and not the injury, that is the sole
cause for the injured employee’s inability to return to work with the
preinjury employer.
2. [An] If, for any reason unrelated to his or her claim for
compensation, an injured employee voluntarily resigns from his or
her employment with the preinjury employer, an insurer [waives its
rights under subsection 1 if the insurer does not make a
determination to] may deny [or suspend] compensation for
temporary total disability and vocational rehabilitation services to
the injured employee within 70 days after the date on which the
insurer learns that the injured employee has [been discharged for
misconduct.] resigned.
3. An insurer may not deny any compensation pursuant to this
section except for compensation for temporary total disability and
vocational rehabilitation services pursuant to [subsection]
subsection 1 [.] or 2.
4. [Discharge] If an injured employee is certified as
temporarily totally disabled, the discharge of the injured employee
for misconduct or the employee’s voluntary resignation from
employment [for reasons other than gross misconduct] does not
limit [an] the injured employee’s entitlement to receive benefits for
temporary total disability.
5. As used in this section, “misconduct” includes, without
limitation, a deliberate violation or disregard, on the part of the
employee, of the laws of this State, standards of behavior or a
policy of the employer with which an employer has the right to
expect the compliance of the employee. The term does not include
a violation of an employer’s policy concerning attendance that is
directly or indirectly related to the injury of the employee and his
or her need for treatment.
Sec. 18. NRS 616C.266 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.266 1. An insurer, including an employer who provides
accident benefits for injured employees pursuant to NRS 616C.265,
who pays an annual increase in compensation for a permanent total
disability to a claimant or a dependent of a claimant pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 616C.473 is entitled to be reimbursed for the
amount of that increase in accordance with this section if the insurer
provides to the Administrator all of the following:
-
*AB469*

– 27 –
(a) The name of the claimant or dependent of a claimant to
whom the insurer paid the increase in compensation.
(b) The claim number under which the compensation for a
permanent total disability was paid to the claimant or dependent of a
claimant.
(c) The date of the industrial injury or disablement from an
occupational disease which resulted in the permanent total disability
of the injured employee.
(d) The date on which the disability of the injured employee was
determined or deemed to be total and permanent.
(e) The amount of the compensation for a permanent total
disability to which the claimant or dependent of a claimant was
entitled as of December 31, 2019.
(f) Proof of the insurer’s payment of the increase in
compensation for a permanent total disability.
(g) The amount of reimbursement requested by the insurer.
2. An insurer must provide the Administrator with the items
required pursuant to subsection 1 not later than March 31 of each
year to be eligible for reimbursement for payments of increases in
compensation for permanent total disability which were made in the
immediately preceding calendar year.
3. If an insurer complies with subsection 2, the Administrator
shall:
(a) Not later than 60 days after the date on which the
Administrator receives the information required by subsection 1,
issue a written determination approving or rejecting the insurer’s
request for reimbursement. If the Administrator fails to issue the
written determination within those 60 days, the request for
reimbursement is deemed approved.
(b) Not later than July 1 of each year, provide the insurer with a
detailed list of reimbursements approved or rejected by the
Administrator.
4. A person who is aggrieved by a written determination of the
Administrator pursuant to this section may appeal the determination
by filing a request for a hearing before an appeals officer. The
request must be filed not later than 30 days after the date on which
the insurer receives notice of the Administrator’s determination.
5. The Administrator shall, not later than May 31 of each year,
mail to each insurer an invoice for any assessment levied by the
Administrator pursuant to NRS 232.680 to be used to pay
reimbursement pursuant to this section. Each insurer shall, not later
than July 31 of each year, pay to the Department of Business and
Industry the amount of the assessment.
6. The Administrator shall make every effort to collect from an
insurer the amount of the assessment described in subsection 5. If
-
*AB469*

– 28 –
the Administrator is not able to collect the amount of the assessment
within 60 days after July 31, the Administrator shall notify the
Commissioner that the insurer is delinquent. An insurer who fails or
refuses to pay the amount of an assessment within 60 days after
July 31 is, after notice and a hearing held pursuant to NRS
679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive, subject to revocation of the
insurer’s certificate of authority to transact insurance in this State.
7. The Administrator shall, not later than December 31 of each
year [,] :
(a) Authorize the State Treasurer to reimburse each insurer that
has paid an annual increase in compensation for a permanent total
disability pursuant to subsection 1 [.] ; and
(b) Provide to each such insurer proof of the authorization
given to the State Treasurer pursuant to paragraph (a).
8. [In] The State Treasurer shall, not later than 10 days after
receiving an authorization described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 7, process and issue to each insurer the payment for
reimbursement authorized pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 7.
9. If an insurer fails to pay the amount of the assessment
described in subsection 5, the Administrator shall apportion to the
insurers that have paid the amount of the assessment an amount of
reimbursement calculated in the same manner in which the
Administrator determines the assessment rate applied to those
insurers pursuant to NRS 232.680. Upon receipt of the amount of
the assessment that is paid after July 31, the Administrator shall pay
to each insurer, the remaining amount of reimbursement to which
the insurer is entitled.
[9.] 10. An insurer may elect to apply any approved
reimbursement under this section towards any current or future
assessment levied by the Administrator pursuant to NRS 232.680.
Sec. 19. NRS 616C.268 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.268 1. An insurer, including, without limitation, an
employer who provides accident benefits for injured employees
pursuant to NRS 616C.265, who pays an increase in death benefits
to a widow, widower, surviving child or surviving dependent parent
pursuant to NRS 616C.508 is entitled to be reimbursed for the
amount of that increase from the Fund for Workers’ Compensation
and Safety if the insurer provides to the Administrator all of the
following:
(a) The name of the widow, widower, surviving child or
surviving dependent parent to whom the insurer paid the increase in
death benefits.
(b) The claim number under which death benefits were paid to
the widow, widower, surviving child or surviving dependent parent.
-
*AB469*

– 29 –
(c) The date of the industrial injury or disablement from an
occupational disease which resulted in the eligibility of the widow,
widower, surviving child or surviving dependent parent for death
benefits.
(d) The date of the death of the injured employee who is the:
(1) Spouse of the widow or widower;
(2) Parent of the surviving child; or
(3) Child of the surviving dependent parent.
(e) The amount of the death benefit to which the widow,
widower, surviving child or surviving dependent parent was entitled
as of December 31, 2019.
(f) Proof of the insurer’s payment of the increase in death
benefits.
(g) The amount of reimbursement requested by the insurer.
2. An insurer must provide the Administrator with the
information required pursuant to subsection 1 not later than
March 31 of each year to be eligible for reimbursement pursuant to
this section for payments of increases in death benefits which were
made in the immediately preceding calendar year.
3. If an insurer complies with subsection 2, the Administrator
shall:
(a) Not later than 60 days after the date on which the
Administrator receives the information required by subsection 1,
issue a written determination approving or rejecting the insurer’s
request for reimbursement. If the Administrator fails to issue the
written determination within those 60 days, the request for
reimbursement is deemed approved.
(b) Not later than July 1 of each year, provide the insurer with a
detailed list of reimbursements approved or rejected by the
Administrator.
4. A person who is aggrieved by a written determination of the
Administrator pursuant to this section may appeal the determination
by filing a request for a hearing before an appeals officer. The
request must be filed not later than 30 days after the date on which
the insurer receives notice of the Administrator’s determination.
5. The Administrator shall, not later than May 31 of each year,
mail to each insurer an invoice for any assessment levied by the
Administrator pursuant to NRS 232.680 to be used to pay
reimbursement pursuant to this section. Each insurer shall, not later
than July 31 of each year, pay to the Department of Business and
Industry the amount of the assessment.
6. The Administrator shall make every effort to collect from an
insurer the amount of the assessment described in subsection 5. If
the Administrator is not able to collect the amount of the assessment
within 60 days after July 31, the Administrator shall notify the
-
*AB469*

– 30 –
Commissioner that the insurer is delinquent. An insurer who fails or
refuses to pay the amount of an assessment within 60 days after
July 31 is, after notice and a hearing held pursuant to NRS
679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive, subject to revocation of the
insurer’s certificate of authority to transact insurance in this State.
7. The Administrator shall, not later than December 31 of each
year [,] :
(a) Authorize the State Treasurer to reimburse each insurer that
has paid an annual increase in death benefits pursuant to subsection
1 [.] ; and
(b) Provide to each such insurer proof of the authorization
given to the State Treasurer pursuant to paragraph (a).
8. The State Treasurer shall, not later than 10 days after
receiving an authorization described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 7, process and issue to each insurer the payment for
reimbursement authorized pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 7.
9. If an insurer fails to pay the amount of the assessment
described in subsection 5, the Administrator shall apportion to the
insurers that have paid the amount of the assessment an amount of
reimbursement calculated in the same manner in which the
Administrator determines the assessment rate applied to those
insurers pursuant to NRS 232.680. Upon receipt of the amount of
the assessment that is paid after July 31, the Administrator shall pay
to each insurer the remaining amount of reimbursement to which the
insurer is entitled.
[9.] 10. An insurer may elect to apply any approved
reimbursement made pursuant to this section towards any current or
future assessment levied by the Administrator pursuant to
NRS 232.680.
Sec. 20. NRS 616C.375 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.375 1. If an insurer, employer or claimant, or the
representative of an insurer, employer or claimant, appeals the
decision of an appeals officer, that decision is not stayed unless a
request for a stay is [granted by] filed with the appeals officer or the
district court .
2. If a request for a stay is filed with the appeals officer or the
district court pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) The decision of the appeals officer is stayed until the
appeals officer or the district court, as applicable, issues an order
granting or denying the request for a stay; and
(b) The appeals officer or the district court, as applicable, must
issue an order granting or denying the request for a stay within 30
days after the date on which the [decision] request for a stay was
-
*AB469*

– 31 –
[rendered.] filed with the appeals officer or the district court, as
applicable.
3. If a request for a stay is denied, the parties must comply
with the decision of the appeals officer within 10 days after the
date on which the order denying the request for a stay is issued.
Sec. 21. NRS 616C.475 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.475 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
NRS 616C.175 and 616C.390, every employee in the employ of an
employer, within the provisions of chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, of NRS, who is injured by accident arising out of and in
the course of employment, or his or her dependents, is entitled to
receive for the period of temporary total disability, 66 2/3 percent of
the average monthly wage.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.028 and
616B.029, an injured employee or his or her dependents are not
entitled to accrue or be paid any benefits for a temporary total
disability during the time the injured employee is incarcerated. The
injured employee or his or her dependents are entitled to receive
such benefits when the injured employee is released from
incarceration if the injured employee is certified as temporarily
totally disabled by a physician or chiropractic physician.
3. If a claim for the period of temporary total disability is
allowed, the first payment pursuant to this section must be issued by
the insurer within 14 working days after receipt of the initial
certification of disability and regularly thereafter.
4. Any increase in compensation and benefits effected by the
amendment of subsection 1 is not retroactive.
5. Payments for a temporary total disability must cease when:
(a) A physician or chiropractic physician determines that the
employee is physically capable of [any gainful] returning to
employment [for] in the occupation in which the employee [is
suited, after giving consideration to the employee’s education,
training and experience;] was employed on the date of his or her
injury;
(b) The employer offers the employee [light-duty employment
or] employment that is temporarily or permanently modified
according to the limitations or restrictions imposed by a physician or
chiropractic physician pursuant to subsection 7; or
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.028 and
616B.029, the employee is incarcerated.
6. Each insurer may, with each check that it issues to an injured
employee for a temporary total disability, include a form approved
by the Division for the injured employee to request continued
compensation for the temporary total disability.
-
*AB469*

– 32 –
7. A certification of disability issued by a physician or
chiropractic physician must:
(a) Include the period of disability and a description of any
physical limitations or restrictions imposed upon [the work of] the
employee;
(b) Specify whether the limitations or restrictions are permanent
or temporary; and
(c) Be signed by the treating physician or chiropractic physician
authorized pursuant to NRS 616B.527 or appropriately chosen
pursuant to subsection 3, 4 or 5 of NRS 616C.090.
8. If the certification of disability specifies that the physical
limitations or restrictions are temporary, the employer of the
employee at the time of the employee’s accident may offer
temporary, light-duty employment to the employee [.] to commence
on a date selected by the employer, which may be as soon as
practicable after the offer is made. If the employer makes such an
offer, the employer shall confirm the offer in writing within 10 days
after making the offer. The making, acceptance or rejection of an
offer of temporary, light-duty employment pursuant to this
subsection does not affect the eligibility of the employee to receive
vocational rehabilitation services, including compensation, and does
not exempt the employer from complying with NRS 616C.545 to
616C.575, inclusive, and 616C.590 or the regulations adopted by
the Division governing vocational rehabilitation services. Any offer
of temporary, light-duty employment made by the employer must
specify a position that:
(a) Is substantially similar to the employee’s position at the time
of his or her injury in relation to the location of the employment and
the [hours] schedule of shifts that the employee is required to work;
(b) Provides a gross wage that is:
(1) If the position is in the same classification of employment
[,] and the physical limitations or restrictions specified satisfy the
physical requirements of the position, equal to the gross wage the
employee was earning at the time of his or her injury; or
(2) If the position is not in the same classification of
employment, substantially similar to the gross wage [the] payable to
an employee [was earning at the time of his or her injury; and] that
works in a position in the same classification of employment; and
(c) Has the same employment benefits as the position of the
employee at the time of his or her injury [.] , subject to any
minimum requirements established by the provider of those
employment benefits.
9. If an injured employee accepts an offer of temporary, light-
duty employment made pursuant to subsection 8 for a position that
is not in the same classification of employment and the gross
-
*AB469*

– 33 –
wage, for the position specified in subparagraph (2) of paragraph
(b) of subsection 8, is less than the amount that the injured
employee is entitled to receive as benefits for a temporary total
disability, the injured employee is entitled to receive benefits for a
temporary partial disability pursuant to NRS 616C.500.
Sec. 22. NRS 616C.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.490 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616C.175,
every employee, in the employ of an employer within the provisions
of chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, of NRS, who is injured by an
accident arising out of and in the course of employment is entitled to
receive the compensation provided for permanent partial disability.
As used in this section, “disability” and “impairment of the whole
person” are equivalent terms.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
(a) Within 30 days after receiving from a physician or
chiropractic physician a report indicating that the injured employee
may have suffered a permanent disability and [is stable and ratable,]
has reached the maximum level of medical improvement, the
insurer shall schedule an appointment with the rating physician or
chiropractic physician selected pursuant to this subsection to
determine the extent of the employee’s disability.
(b) Unless the insurer and the injured employee otherwise agree
to a rating physician or chiropractic physician:
(1) The insurer shall select the rating physician or
chiropractic physician from the list of qualified rating physicians
and chiropractic physicians designated by the Administrator, to
determine the percentage of disability in accordance with the
American Medical Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of
Permanent Impairment as adopted and supplemented by the
Division pursuant to NRS 616C.110.
(2) Rating physicians and chiropractic physicians must be
selected at random from the list of qualified physicians and
chiropractic physicians designated by the Administrator unless the
physician or chiropractic physician who is selected is currently an
employee of the insurer making the selection, in which case another
random selection must be made until a physician or chiropractic
physician who is not currently an employee of the insurer is
selected.
(3) A rating physician or chiropractic physician selected
pursuant to subparagraph (1) or (2) may decline the selection if he
or she believes he or she does not have the ability to rate the
disability at issue.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an injured
employee or the legal representative of an injured employee may, at
any time, without limitation, request that the Administrator select a
-
*AB469*

– 34 –
rating physician or chiropractic physician from the list of qualified
physicians and chiropractic physicians designated by the
Administrator. The Administrator, upon receipt of the request, shall
immediately select for the injured employee the rating physician or
chiropractic physician at random from the list.
4. If an insurer contacts a treating physician or chiropractic
physician to determine whether an injured employee has suffered a
permanent disability, the insurer shall deliver to the treating
physician or chiropractic physician that portion or a summary of that
portion of the American Medical Association’s Guides to the
Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as adopted by the Division
pursuant to NRS 616C.110 that is relevant to the type of injury
incurred by the employee.
5. At the request of the insurer, the injured employee shall,
before an evaluation by a rating physician or chiropractic physician
is performed, notify the insurer of:
(a) Any previous evaluations performed to determine the extent
of any of the employee’s disabilities; and
(b) Any previous injury, disease or condition sustained by the
employee which is relevant to the evaluation performed pursuant to
this section.
 The notice must be on a form approved by the Administrator and
provided to the injured employee by the insurer at the time of the
insurer’s request.
6. Unless the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 616C.110
provide otherwise, a rating evaluation must include an evaluation of
the loss of motion, sensation and strength of an injured employee if
the injury is of a type that might have caused such a loss. Except
in the case of claims accepted pursuant to NRS 616C.180, no factors
other than the degree of physical impairment of the whole person
may be considered in calculating the entitlement to compensation
for a permanent partial disability.
7. The rating physician or chiropractic physician shall provide
the insurer with his or her evaluation of the injured employee. After
receiving the evaluation, the insurer shall, within 14 days, provide
the employee with a copy of the evaluation and notify the employee:
(a) Of the compensation to which the employee is entitled
pursuant to this section; or
(b) That the employee is not entitled to benefits for permanent
partial disability.
8. Each 1 percent of impairment of the whole person must be
compensated by a monthly payment:
(a) Of 0.5 percent of the claimant’s average monthly wage for
injuries sustained before July 1, 1981;
-
*AB469*

– 35 –
(b) Of 0.6 percent of the claimant’s average monthly wage for
injuries sustained on or after July 1, 1981, and before June 18, 1993;
(c) Of 0.54 percent of the claimant’s average monthly wage for
injuries sustained on or after June 18, 1993, and before January 1,
2000; and
(d) Of 0.6 percent of the claimant’s average monthly wage for
injuries sustained on or after January 1, 2000.
 Compensation must commence on the date of the injury or the
day following the termination of temporary disability compensation,
if any, whichever is later, and must continue on a monthly basis for
5 years or until the claimant is 70 years of age, whichever is later.
9. Compensation benefits may be paid annually to claimants
who will be receiving less than $100 a month.
10. If there is a previous disability, the percentage of disability
for a subsequent injury must be determined pursuant to
NRS 616C.099.
11. In the event of a dispute over an award of compensation for
permanent partial disability, the insurer shall commence making
installment payments to the [injured employee] claimant for that
portion of the award that is not in dispute:
(a) Not later than the date by which such payment is required
pursuant to subsection 8 or 9, as applicable; and
(b) Without requiring the [injured employee] claimant to make
an election whether to receive his or her compensation in
installment payments or in a lump sum.
 Upon the conclusion of the dispute, the claimant shall, in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 616C.495, make an
election whether to receive his or her award of compensation for
permanent partial disability in installment payments or in a lump
sum.
12. The Division may adopt schedules for rating permanent
disabilities resulting from injuries sustained before July 1, 1973, and
reasonable regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.
13. The increase in compensation and benefits effected by the
amendment of this section is not retroactive for accidents which
occurred before July 1, 1973.
14. This section does not entitle any person to double payments
for the death of an employee and a continuation of payments for a
permanent partial disability, or to a greater sum in the aggregate
than if the injury had been fatal.
15. The Administrator shall prepare and publish on the Internet
website of the Division an annual report which contains:
(a) The name of each rating physician or chiropractic physician
who was selected in the immediately preceding year to conduct an
-
*AB469*

– 36 –
evaluation to determine the extent of an employee’s disability
pursuant to this section; and
(b) For each rating physician or chiropractic physician identified
pursuant to paragraph (a):
(1) The number of times the rating physician or chiropractic
physician was selected to conduct an evaluation to determine the
extent of an employee’s disability; and
(2) The number of evaluations that the rating physician or
chiropractic physician completed.
Sec. 23. NRS 616C.495 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.495 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616C.380,
an award for a permanent partial disability may be paid in a lump
sum under the following conditions:
(a) A claimant injured on or after July 1, 1973, and before
July 1, 1981, who incurs a disability that does not exceed 12 percent
may elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum. A
claimant injured on or after July 1, 1981, and before July 1, 1995,
who incurs a disability that does not exceed 30 percent may elect to
receive his or her compensation in a lump sum.
(b) The spouse, or in the absence of a spouse, any dependent
child of a deceased claimant injured on or after July 1, 1973, who is
not entitled to compensation in accordance with NRS 616C.505, is
entitled to a lump sum equal to the present value of the deceased
claimant’s undisbursed award for a permanent partial disability.
(c) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 1981, and before
July 1, 1995, who incurs a disability that exceeds 30 percent may
elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum equal to the
present value of an award for a disability of 30 percent. If the
claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to this paragraph,
the insurer shall pay in installments to the claimant that portion of
the claimant’s disability in excess of 30 percent.
(d) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 1995, and before
January 1, 2016, who incurs a disability that:
(1) Does not exceed 25 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 25 percent may:
(I) Elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum
equal to the present value of an award for a disability of 25 percent.
If the claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to this sub-
subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in installments to the claimant
that portion of the claimant’s disability in excess of 25 percent.
(II) To the extent that the insurer has offered to provide
compensation in a lump sum up to the present value of an award for
disability of 30 percent, elect to receive his or her compensation in a
lump sum up to the present value of an award for a disability of 30
-
*AB469*

– 37 –
percent. If the claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to
this sub-subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in installments to the
claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability in excess of 30
percent.
(e) Any claimant injured on or after January 1, 2016, and before
July 1, 2017, who incurs a disability that:
(1) Does not exceed 30 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 30 percent may elect to receive his or her
compensation in a lump sum equal to the present value of an award
for a disability of 30 percent. If the claimant elects to receive
compensation pursuant to this subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in
installments to the claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability
in excess of 30 percent.
(f) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 2017, who incurs a
disability that:
(1) Does not exceed 30 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 30 percent may elect to receive his or her
compensation in a lump sum equal to the present value of an award
for a disability of up to 30 percent. If the claimant elects to receive
compensation pursuant to this subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in
installments to the claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability
in excess of 30 percent.
(g) If the permanent partial disability rating of a claimant
seeking compensation pursuant to this section would, when
combined with any previous permanent partial disability rating of
the claimant that resulted in an award of benefits to the claimant,
result in the claimant having a total permanent partial disability
rating in excess of 100 percent, the claimant’s disability rating upon
which compensation is calculated must be reduced by such
percentage as required to limit the total permanent partial disability
rating of the claimant for all injuries to not more than 100 percent.
2. If the claimant elects to receive his or her payment for a
permanent partial disability in a lump sum pursuant to subsection 1,
all of the claimant’s benefits for compensation terminate. [Except as
otherwise provided in paragraph (d), the] The claimant’s acceptance
of that payment constitutes a final settlement of all factual and legal
issues in the case. By [so] accepting payment for a permanent
partial disability in a lump sum pursuant to subsection 1, the
claimant waives all of his or her rights regarding the claim,
including the right to appeal from the closure of the case or the
percentage of his or her disability, except:
(a) The right of the claimant to:
-
*AB469*

– 38 –
(1) Reopen his or her claim in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 616C.390; or
(2) Have his or her claim considered by his or her insurer
pursuant to NRS 616C.392;
(b) Any counseling, training or other rehabilitative services
provided by the insurer; and
(c) The right of the claimant to receive a benefit penalty in
accordance with NRS 616D.120 . [; and
(d) The right of the claimant to conclude or resolve any
contested matter which is pending at the time that the claimant
executes his or her election to receive his or her payment for a
permanent partial disability in a lump sum. The provisions of this
paragraph do not apply to:
(1) The scope of the claim;
(2) The claimant’s stable and ratable status; and
(3) The claimant’s average monthly wage.]
3. The claimant, when he or she demands payment in a lump
sum pursuant to subsection 2, must be provided with a written
notice which prominently displays a statement describing the effects
of accepting payment in a lump sum of an entire permanent partial
disability award, any portion of such an award or any uncontested
portion of such an award, and that the claimant has 20 days after the
mailing or personal delivery of the notice within which to retract or
reaffirm the demand, before payment may be made and the
claimant’s election becomes final.
4. Any lump-sum payment which has been paid on a claim
incurred on or after July 1, 1973, must be supplemented if necessary
to conform to the provisions of this section.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the total
lump-sum payment for disablement must not be less than one-half
the product of the average monthly wage multiplied by the
percentage of disability. If the claimant received compensation in
installment payments for his or her permanent partial disability
before electing to receive payment for that disability in a lump sum,
the lump-sum payment must be calculated for the remaining
payment of compensation.
6. The lump sum payable must be equal to the present value of
the compensation awarded, less any advance payment or lump sum
previously paid. The present value must be calculated using monthly
payments in the amounts prescribed in subsection 8 of NRS
616C.490 and actuarial annuity tables adopted by the Division. The
tables must be reviewed annually by a consulting actuary and must
be adjusted accordingly on July 1 of each year by the Division
using:
-
*AB469*

– 39 –
(a) The most recent unisex “Static Mortality Tables for Defined
Benefit Pension Plans” published by the Internal Revenue Service;
and
(b) The average 30-Year Treasury Constant Maturity Rate for
March of the current year as reported by the Board of Governors of
the Federal Reserve System.
7. To calculate the present value of a lump sum payable to a
claimant, the insurer shall use the actuarial annuity tables adopted
by the Division that are in effect on the date on which the claimant
elects payment in a lump sum.
8. If a claimant would receive more money by electing to
receive compensation in a lump sum than the claimant would if he
or she receives installment payments, the claimant may elect to
receive the lump-sum payment.
Sec. 24. NRS 616C.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.570 1. A plan for a program of vocational rehabilitation
developed pursuant to NRS 616C.555 may include a program for
on-the-job training, if the training is suitable for the injured
employee.
2. Before an injured employee may participate in a program for
on-the-job training, the insurer and the employer who is to provide
the training must execute a written agreement which contains a
statement of the cost of the training, a schedule of the training and
an explanation of the training . [and a schedule for that training.]
3. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the] The
insurer may pay [not more than 50 percent of the wages of] benefits
for a temporary partial disability to an injured employee who is
participating in a program for on-the-job training. [An insurer
contributing toward the wages of an injured employee shall pay the
employee within 10 days after the employee submits documentation
of his or her payroll to the insurer. The insurer shall not contribute
to the wages of the injured employee for more than the period
authorized for the particular employee pursuant to subsection 3 of
NRS 616C.555 or 616C.560.
4. The insurer shall, within 30 days after receipt of a request
for payment, reimburse the training employer for the wages paid by
the training employer to the injured employee pursuant to this
section if:
(a) After the successful completion of the training, the training
employer continues to employ the injured employee for at least 90
days in a position which requires the training so obtained; or
(b) The injured employee:
(1) Within 30 days after his or her successful completion of
the training, obtains employment which requires the skills obtained
-
*AB469*

– 40 –
by him or her as a direct result of the training provided by the
training employer; and
(2) Retains that or similar employment for at least 6 months
after the completion of the training.]
Sec. 25. NRS 616D.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616D.120 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if
the Administrator determines that an insurer, organization for
managed care, health care provider, third-party administrator,
employer or professional employer organization has:
(a) Induced a claimant to fail to report an accidental injury or
occupational disease;
(b) Without justification, persuaded a claimant to:
(1) Settle for an amount which is less than reasonable;
(2) Settle for an amount which is less than reasonable while a
hearing or an appeal is pending; or
(3) Accept less than the compensation found to be due the
claimant by a hearing officer, appeals officer, court of competent
jurisdiction, written settlement agreement, written stipulation or the
Division when carrying out its duties pursuant to chapters 616A to
617, inclusive, of NRS;
(c) Refused to pay or unreasonably delayed payment to a
claimant of compensation or other relief found to be due the
claimant by a hearing officer, appeals officer, court of competent
jurisdiction, written settlement agreement, written stipulation or the
Division when carrying out its duties pursuant to chapters 616A to
616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS, if the refusal or delay
occurs:
(1) Later than 10 days after the date of the settlement
agreement or stipulation;
(2) Later than 30 days after the date of the decision of a
court, hearing officer, appeals officer or the Division, unless a stay
has been granted; or
(3) Later than 10 days after a stay of the decision of a court,
hearing officer, appeals officer or the Division has been lifted;
(d) Refused to process a claim for compensation pursuant to
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS;
(e) Made it necessary for a claimant to initiate proceedings
pursuant to chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of
NRS for compensation or other relief found to be due the claimant
by a hearing officer, appeals officer, court of competent jurisdiction,
written settlement agreement, written stipulation or the Division
when carrying out its duties pursuant to chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS;
-
*AB469*

– 41 –
(f) Failed to comply with the Division’s regulations covering the
payment of an assessment relating to the funding of costs of
administration of chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS;
(g) Failed to provide or unreasonably delayed payment to an
injured employee or reimbursement to an insurer pursuant to
NRS 616C.165;
(h) Engaged in a pattern of untimely payments to injured
employees; or
(i) Intentionally failed to comply with any provision of, or
regulation adopted pursuant to, this chapter or chapter 616A, 616B,
616C or 617 of NRS,
 the Administrator shall impose an administrative fine of $1,500
for each initial violation, or a fine of $15,000 for a second or
subsequent violation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS, if the Administrator determines
that an insurer, organization for managed care, health care provider,
third-party administrator, employer or professional employer
organization has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter
or chapter 616A, 616B, 616C or 617 of NRS, or any regulation
adopted pursuant thereto, the Administrator may take any of the
following actions:
(a) Issue a notice of correction for:
(1) A minor violation, as defined by regulations adopted by
the Division; or
(2) A violation involving the payment of compensation in an
amount which is greater than that required by any provision of this
chapter or chapter 616A, 616B, 616C or 617 of NRS, or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
 The notice of correction must set forth with particularity the
violation committed and the manner in which the violation may be
corrected. The provisions of this section do not authorize the
Administrator to modify or negate in any manner a determination or
any portion of a determination made by a hearing officer, appeals
officer or court of competent jurisdiction or a provision contained in
a written settlement agreement or written stipulation.
(b) Impose an administrative fine pursuant to subsection 3 for:
(1) A [second or subsequent] violation for which a notice of
correction has been issued pursuant to paragraph (a); or
(2) Any other violation of this chapter or chapter 616A,
616B, 616C or 617 of NRS, or any regulation adopted pursuant
thereto, for which a notice of correction may not be issued pursuant
to paragraph (a).
-
*AB469*

– 42 –
[ The fine imposed must not be greater than $375 for an initial
violation, or more than $3,000 for any second or subsequent
violation.]
(c) Order a plan of corrective action to be submitted to the
Administrator within 30 days after the date of the order.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
administrative fine imposed pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 must not be more than:
(a) Three hundred seventy-five dollars for the first violation of
a particular type;
(b) Seven hundred fifty dollars for a second violation of the
same type;
(c) One thousand five hundred dollars for a third violation of
the same type; and
(d) Three thousand dollars for a fourth or any subsequent
violation of the same type.
 If the Administrator determines that an insurer, organization
for managed care, health care provider, third-party administrator,
employer or professional employer organization has, for a period
of 2 years, complied with its plan of corrective action submitted to
the Administrator pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 2 and
committed no additional violations as set forth in that plan, the
Administrator shall set the amount of the next administrative fine,
if any, imposed against the insurer, organization for managed
care, health care provider, third-party administrator, employer or
professional employer organization, as applicable, as if that
insurer, organization for managed care, health care provider,
third-party administrator, employer or professional employer
organization, as applicable, had previously committed no
violations of any type.
4. If the Administrator determines that a violation of any of the
provisions of paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive, (h) or (i) of subsection
1 has occurred, the Administrator shall order the insurer,
organization for managed care, health care provider, third-party
administrator, employer or professional employer organization to
pay to the claimant a benefit penalty:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), in an amount
that is not less than $17,000 and not greater than $120,000; or
(b) Of $3,000 if the violation involves a late payment of
compensation or other relief to a claimant in an amount which is
less than $500 or which is not more than 14 days late.
[4.] 5. To determine the amount of the benefit penalty, the
Administrator shall consider the degree of physical harm suffered by
the injured employee or the dependents of the injured employee as a
result of the violation of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (h) or (i) of
-
*AB469*

– 43 –
subsection 1, the amount of compensation found to be due the
claimant and the number of fines and benefit penalties, other than a
benefit penalty described in paragraph (b) of subsection [3,] 4,
previously imposed against the insurer, organization for managed
care, health care provider, third-party administrator, employer or
professional employer organization pursuant to this section. The
Administrator shall also consider the degree of economic harm
suffered by the injured employee or the dependents of the injured
employee as a result of the violation of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d),
(e), (h) or (i) of subsection 1. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the benefit penalty is for the benefit of the claimant and
must be paid directly to the claimant within 15 days after the date of
the Administrator’s determination. If the claimant is the injured
employee and the claimant dies before the benefit penalty is paid to
him or her, the benefit penalty must be paid to the estate of the
claimant. Proof of the payment of the benefit penalty must be
submitted to the Administrator within 15 days after the date of the
Administrator’s determination unless an appeal is filed pursuant to
NRS 616D.140 and [a stay has been granted.] the appeals process is
not yet complete. Any compensation to which the claimant may
otherwise be entitled pursuant to chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive,
or chapter 617 of NRS must not be reduced by the amount of any
benefit penalty received pursuant to this subsection. To determine
the amount of the benefit penalty in cases of multiple violations
occurring within a certain period of time, the Administrator shall
adopt regulations which take into consideration:
(a) The number of violations within a certain number of years
for which a benefit penalty was imposed; and
(b) The number of claims handled by the insurer, organization
for managed care, health care provider, third-party administrator,
employer or professional employer organization in relation to the
number of benefit penalties previously imposed within the period of
time prescribed pursuant to paragraph (a).
[5.] 6. In addition to any fine or benefit penalty imposed
pursuant to this section, the Administrator may assess against an
insurer who violates any regulation concerning the reporting of
claims expenditures or premiums received that are used to calculate
an assessment an administrative penalty of up to twice the amount
of any underpaid assessment.
[6.] 7. If:
(a) The Administrator determines that a person has violated any
of the provisions of NRS 616D.200, 616D.220, 616D.240,
616D.300, 616D.310 or 616D.350 to 616D.440, inclusive; and
(b) The Fraud Control Unit for Industrial Insurance of the Office
of the Attorney General established pursuant to NRS 228.420
-
*AB469*

– 44 –
notifies the Administrator that the Unit will not prosecute the person
for that violation,
 the Administrator shall impose an administrative fine of not more
than $15,000.
[7.] 8. Two or more fines of $1,000 or more imposed in 1 year
for acts enumerated in subsection 1 must be considered by the
Commissioner as evidence for the withdrawal of:
(a) A certificate to act as a self-insured employer.
(b) A certificate to act as an association of self-insured public or
private employers.
(c) A certificate of registration as a third-party administrator.
[8.] 9. The Commissioner may, without complying with the
provisions of NRS 616B.327 or 616B.431, withdraw the
certification of a self-insured employer, association of self-insured
public or private employers or third-party administrator if, after a
hearing, it is shown that the self-insured employer, association of
self-insured public or private employers or third-party administrator
violated any provision of subsection 1.
[9.] 10. If the Administrator determines that a vocational
rehabilitation counselor has violated the provisions of NRS
616C.543, the Administrator may impose an administrative fine on
the vocational rehabilitation counselor of not more than $250 for a
first violation, $500 for a second violation and $1,000 for a third or
subsequent violation.
[10.] 11. The Administrator may make a claim against the
bond required pursuant to NRS 683A.0857 for the payment of any
administrative fine or benefit penalty imposed for a violation of the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 26. NRS 616D.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616D.130 1. Upon receipt of a complaint for a violation of
subsection 1, 2 or [3] 4 of NRS 616D.120, or if the Administrator
has reason to believe that such a violation has occurred, the
Administrator shall:
(a) Promptly provide a copy of the complaint, or an explanation
of the reason the Administrator believes that a violation has
occurred to:
(1) The Commissioner; and
(2) The insurer, organization for managed care, health care
provider, third-party administrator, employer or professional
employer organization that allegedly committed the violation; and
(b) Cause to be conducted an investigation of the alleged
violation.
2. The Administrator shall:
(a) Within 30 days after receipt of a complaint pursuant to
subsection 1, initiate an investigation;
-
*AB469*

– 45 –
(b) Within 60 days after the date on which the investigation is
initiated, complete the investigation; and
(c) Within 30 days after the investigation is completed, render a
determination and deliver a copy of the determination to:
(1) The Commissioner; and
(2) The insurer, organization for managed care, health care
provider, third-party administrator, employer or professional
employer organization that was the subject of the investigation.
3. The determination rendered pursuant to subsection 2 must
include the Administrator’s findings of fact, any settlement
agreement on the matter and, if the Administrator determines that a
violation has occurred, one or more of the following:
(a) The amount of any fine required to be paid pursuant to
NRS 616D.120.
(b) The amount of any benefit penalty required to be paid to a
claimant pursuant to NRS 616D.120.
(c) A plan of corrective action to be taken by the insurer,
organization for managed care, health care provider, third-party
administrator or employer, including the manner and time within
which the violation must be corrected.
(d) A requirement that notice of the violation be given to the
appropriate agency that regulates the activities of the violator.
4. If, based upon the Administrator’s findings of fact, the
Administrator determines that a violation has not occurred, the
Administrator shall issue a determination to that effect.
Sec. 27. NRS 616D.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616D.140 1. If a person wishes to contest a decision of the
Administrator to impose or refuse to impose a benefit penalty
pursuant to NRS 616D.120, the person must file a notice of appeal
with an appeals officer in accordance with this section. The notice
of appeal must set forth the reasons the proposed benefit penalty
should or should not be imposed.
2. A person who is aggrieved by:
(a) A written determination of the Administrator; or
(b) The failure of the Administrator to respond within 120 days
to a complaint filed pursuant to NRS 616D.130 and received by the
Administrator from the person who is aggrieved,
 may appeal from the determination or failure to respond by filing
a request for a hearing before an appeals officer. The request must
be filed within 30 days after the date on which the notice of the
Administrator’s determination was mailed by the Administrator or
within 150 days after the date on which the unanswered complaint
was received by the Administrator, as applicable. The failure of the
Administrator to respond within 120 days after receipt of the
complaint shall be deemed by the appeals officer to be a denial of
-
*AB469*

– 46 –
any allegation of a violation of subsection 1, 2 or [3] 4 of NRS
616D.120 set forth in the complaint. After the expiration of the 120-
day period after receipt of the complaint, the Administrator shall
have no further jurisdiction to issue a determination concerning the
complaint, and only the appeals officer shall have jurisdiction over
the decision to impose or refuse to impose the benefit penalty.
3. If a notice of appeal is not filed as required by this section,
the imposition of or refusal to impose the benefit penalty shall be
deemed a final order and is not subject to review by any court or
agency.
4. A hearing held pursuant to this section must be conducted by
the appeals officer as a hearing de novo. The appeals officer shall
render a written decision on the appeal. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the provisions of NRS 616C.345 to
616C.385, inclusive, apply to an appeal filed pursuant to this
section.
5. A benefit penalty imposed pursuant to NRS 616D.120 must
be paid to the claimant on whose behalf it is imposed. If such a
payment is not made within the period required by NRS 616D.120,
the benefit penalty may be recovered in a civil action brought by the
Administrator on behalf of the claimant in a court of competent
jurisdiction in the county in which the claimant resides, in which the
violation occurred or in which the person who is required to pay the
benefit penalty has his or her principal place of business.
6. Any party aggrieved by a decision issued pursuant to this
section by an appeals officer may appeal the decision directly to the
district court.
7. If an appeals officer or district court renders a decision
upholding the imposition of a benefit penalty, the insurer,
organization for managed care, health care provider, third-party
administrator, employer or professional employer organization upon
which the benefit penalty is imposed shall, not later than 30 days
after the date on which the decision is rendered [, unless an appeal is
filed and a stay has been granted,] and the appeals process is
complete, pay to the claimant the benefit penalty in an amount equal
to twice the amount of the benefit penalty initially imposed.
8. If a claimant enters into a settlement agreement with an
insurer, organization for managed care, health care provider, third-
party administrator, employer or professional employer organization
concerning the amount of a benefit penalty owed to the claimant, the
insurer, organization for managed care, health care provider, third-
party administrator, employer or professional employer organization
shall pay directly to the claimant the amount agreed upon in the
settlement agreement not later than 15 days after the date on which
the settlement agreement is made.
-
*AB469*

– 47 –
9. If an insurer, organization for managed care, health care
provider, third-party administrator, employer or professional
employer organization fails to pay a benefit penalty to a claimant
within the time limits imposed by this section or subsection [4] 5 of
NRS 616D.120, the Commissioner may suspend, pending an
investigation or any other disciplinary action, any certificate issued
by the Commissioner to the insurer, organization for managed care,
health care provider, third-party administrator, employer or
professional employer organization, as applicable.
Sec. 28. NRS 618.9909 is hereby amended to read as follows:
618.9909 1. The Division shall, by regulation, approve
OSHA-10 courses and OSHA-30 courses for the purposes of
fulfilling the requirements of NRS 618.9911.
2. The Division shall establish a registry to track the providers
of courses approved pursuant to subsection 1.
[3. The Division shall adopt regulations that set forth
guidelines for job-specific training to qualify as continuing
education for the purposes of NRS 618.9911.]
Sec. 29. NRS 618.9911 is hereby amended to read as follows:
618.9911 1. The provisions of subsections 2 and 3 do not
apply to a worker who is employed by a single employer for a
period of less than 15 consecutive days.
2. Not later than 15 days after the date a worker other than a
supervisory employee begins work on a site, the worker must obtain
a completion card for an OSHA-10 course which is issued upon
completion of a course approved by the Division pursuant to
NRS 618.9909.
3. Not later than 15 days after the date a supervisory employee
begins work on a site, the supervisory employee must obtain a
completion card for an OSHA-30 course which is issued upon
completion of a course approved by the Division pursuant to
NRS 618.9909.
[4. Any completion card used to satisfy the requirements of
this section expires 5 years after the date it is issued and may be
renewed by:
(a) Completing an OSHA-10 course or OSHA-30 course, as
applicable, within the previous 5 years; or
(b) Providing proof satisfactory to the Division that the worker
has completed continuing education within the previous 5 years
consisting of job-specific training that meets the guidelines
established by the Division pursuant to NRS 618.9909 in an amount
of:
(1) For a completion card issued for an OSHA-10 course, not
less than 5 hours; or
-
*AB469*

– 48 –
(2) For a completion card issued for an OSHA-30 course, not
less than 15 hours.]
Sec. 30. NRS 618.9927 is hereby amended to read as follows:
618.9927 1. The Division shall, by regulation, approve
OSHA-10 courses and OSHA-30 courses for the purposes of
fulfilling the requirements of NRS 618.9929.
2. The Division shall establish a registry to track the providers
of courses approved pursuant to subsection 1.
[3. The Division shall adopt regulations that set forth
guidelines for job-specific training to qualify as continuing
education for the purposes of NRS 618.9929.]
Sec. 31. NRS 618.9929 is hereby amended to read as follows:
618.9929 1. Not later than 15 days after the date a worker
other than a supervisory employee is hired, the worker must obtain a
completion card for an OSHA-10 course which is issued upon
completion of a course approved by the Division pursuant to
NRS 618.9927.
2. Not later than 15 days after the date a supervisory employee
is hired, the supervisory employee must obtain a completion card for
an OSHA-30 course which is issued upon completion of a course
approved by the Division pursuant to NRS 618.9927.
[3. Any completion card used to satisfy the requirements of
this section expires 5 years after the date it is issued and may be
renewed by:
(a) Completing an OSHA-10 course or OSHA-30 course, as
applicable, within the previous 5 years; or
(b) Providing proof satisfactory to the Division that the worker
has completed continuing education within the previous 5 years
consisting of job-specific training that meets the guidelines
established by the Division pursuant to NRS 618.9927 in an amount
of:
(1) For a completion card issued for an OSHA-10 course, not
less than 5 hours; or
(2) For a completion card issued for an OSHA-30 course, not
less than 15 hours.]
Sec. 32. 1. The provisions of any administrative regulations
which conflict or are inconsistent with the provisions of this act are
void, including, without limitation, the provisions of any
administrative regulations which impose an assessment relating to a
subsequent injury account pursuant to NRS 616B.554, 616B.575 or
616B.584 as those sections existed before October 1, 2025.
2. As used in this section, “subsequent injury account” means:
(a) The Subsequent Injury Account for Self-Insured Employers
created by NRS 616B.554;
-
*AB469*

– 49 –
(b) The Subsequent Injury Account for Associations of Self-
Insured Public or Private Employers created by NRS 616B.575; and
(c) The Subsequent Injury Account for Private Carriers created
by NRS 616B.584.
Sec. 33. The amendatory provisions of sections 4 to 27,
inclusive, and 32 of this act do not affect a claim, action or
proceeding commenced or right accrued before October 1, 2025.
Sec. 34. NRS 616B.222 is hereby repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
616B.222 Determination of total amount paid to employees
for services performed during policy year. To determine the
total amount paid to employees for services performed, the
maximum amount paid to any one employee during a policy year
shall be deemed to be $36,000.
H
-
*AB469*